You know, it's definitely scary stuff and, it makes you sort of think about things that you wouldn't normally think about, particularly with the family too. Right. you know, it wasn't like it was just me. So, yeah, scary stuff.
glad that we were just fine. but it just sort of rattled the family quite a bit and obviously waking up at whatever time it happened, 1 32 in the morning, I mean, it was pretty scary stuff. Needless to say, I didn't sleep that much that day, that's for sure. Yeah, no, I mean, so since then I've put in so many security lights, you know?
You always look at it now, like no matter what, like, I'm like, that's kind of, again, at least they didn't like take anyone hostage or anything like that. But it's a Correct, it's a, you start looking at things differently where you probably wanted it before and Yeah, it's scary stuff.
So thank God everything was fine and you know, we. Yeah, no one got hurt or anything. So I mean, in the grand scheme of things, it, it actually ended up being better than it could have been. Right. which was good. But you know, hopefully we don't go through that again. 
do y'all have water or anything else you need? Now we have our coffees in front of us, so that should be just [00:01:00] fine. Okay, cool. I think I'll just talk to Tommy's ear off while you were gone. 'cause this is Matthew now, right? Yes. Okay.
it'll be mostly y'all speaking. I usually just ask the question, so I didn't know if you had any other questions before we got started. No, I think that we're good to go. Okay, cool. And so you hit the record on the yes. Yep. Cool. All right. So. Usually it'll probably go a little bit over an hour.
Hopefully that's okay too. Is that, do we have a hard stop? No, we're fine. Going longer. Okay, perfect. I usually find the longer ones with up being better and then, did y'all get a chance to listen to any of the previous episodes or anything? We, yeah, we, you know, I mean this actually, I think before the initial one, so had a chance to do that and then, you know, also just listen to other podcasts to understand sort of, you know, and we were listeners of other podcasts as well before this, but just understand sort of how these things, normally go and, what is it that we actually should be speaking about that might be interesting to the audience.
I think what we sort of determine was being as honest as [00:02:00] we can makes, the biggest difference. it allows, us to provide pertinent information that might be, interesting to those that are listening. And so that's what we'll do today. so we're excited to, tell our story.
Cool. Alright. And then, like I said, I don't mind, Like, it sounds like I might be a little bit further away, but as long as y'all's mic is close enough that, you have it close enough because again, I won't be able to listen to it at all for me to check it. So you used it in whatever instance.
You have it set up right now? Yes. Yep. Okay, perfect. We have a nice and close. Alright, cool. Perfect. Alright. So I'm ready if y'all ready. Y'all ready? Yeah, we're ready. Okay. So usually what I'll do, a tell person introduces themselves, say your name, your age, usually your, your location and tell us about your business, a little bit.
So if, I guess one guy wants to introduce himself first and then the brother introduce himself second. And then, like I said, I, y'all work back and forth as far as when I ask the questions, decide who's gonna answer 'em. But we'll talk about your company overall for five or 10 minutes and then we'll rewind it to, you coming outta your mother's womb or wherever you wanna start as far as business wise and whatnot.
All right. [00:03:00] So here it is. One more time. so yeah, just give me your name, your age, and your location, and then tell us a little bit about your business. Yeah, so my name is Matthew Carone. I am 36 years old, and I'm one of the co-owners of, a real estate company in Washington, DC called Gordon James Real Estate.
Yep. And I'm Tom Carone. I'm his twin brother. So also, you know, 36, I live right outside of Washington, DC and yeah. Do you want to sort of give some of the, you know, kind of background on the company? Yeah. So our business has been in, in existence for now about nine years, and we started as primarily your traditional property management company, so managing, single family units.
and then we expanded that business relatively quickly. maybe we'll get into that a little bit later on, but, we expanded that into. more of the commercial realm of property management. So, HOAs, condo associations, any really community associations that are [00:04:00] in and around dc. the areas that we serve are, primarily Washington, DC as well as Virginia and Maryland as well.
Very small parts of Maryland that are proximity wise, pretty close to dc beyond the commercial management and residential management. We also, are a brokerage, so we mainly focus on listings or on the listing side. I serve as the principal broker, of Gordon James Brokerage. 
And then finally, we are also, looking into expanding the business to a new market. So New York City. we've recently partnered with, someone in New York to help us, You know, break into that market. And so that's still ongoing, but currently, we're not, you know, serving clients in New York quite yet.
it's probably gonna be maybe a second or two seconds longer to lay when I ask a question just to make sure it's easy for us to edit that out. Does that make sense for both of y'all? That does. Okay, cool. So if it does, I usually am not that awkward to try to make it like [00:05:00] a longer, like if I give it a couple of seconds silence, it's only to help with the editing afterwards.
I'll mute while y'all are talking and if I, if you don't hear me, I'll make sure I'll unmute that way again, 'cause that that's, I've done enough editing and have my team has done that. I know, I'm glad I figured that out or thought about that now.
so how big is y'all's companies today? Yeah, so we have, 23 employees. and, you know, we, in terms of the sort of gross revenue of the company, it's about 4 million or a little bit over that. Yeah. And how long have y'all been in business?
So we've been in business since 2014. so that makes it about, nine years, eight, nine years now. And so, yeah, with that, I mean, what did y'all start off with? Like employee count? Was it just the two of y'all, or like, can you just tell me how it's kind of grown over the years? Well, so yeah. So the business actually originally and, and, yeah, this is Tom.
So the business originally started off, with me and a roommate that I had from college. [00:06:00] so we both moved to Washington dc Matt actually moved here as well. and then Matt ended up moving to New York to be with his girlfriend, who was now his wife. and so my friend and I sort of had this idea of starting a property management company and to sort of take a little step back, the reason why we got into it in the first place was we both went to, a school called Binghamton University in upstate New York.
we graduated there in 2008 and at that time, real estate was incredibly cheap there. we always kind of had an interest in real estate. and so we ended up buying our first property. we ended up renting it. We managed it from a different state. It ended up, proving to be fairly challenging.
we then, sort of changed gears a little bit, found a property manager who was local. and then that's what sort of exposed us to the property management industry. We had interest in it. We did some, research on the local market. We found that a lot of the companies were generational businesses that didn't really seem to utilize a lot of technology.
[00:07:00] And so we felt like we could kind of come in, you know, being younger and starting fresh, building a company primarily based on the use of technology. And then so specifically, do y'all just deal with commercial real estate or do you do residential too? So we still do residential. and the business started off with us just doing like single family residential properties.
The reason why we started in that is that that's sort of like the lowest barrier to, to entry. you know, a lot of companies as they get bigger, they sort of phase out the single family property management business. We still kind of tend to like that business mainly because it's a really diversified business.
instead of having, maybe 25 or 30 large commercial buildings that, you're managing each of those clients representing, a large percentage of the overall revenue. We liked the residential side because, we had, 600 plus clients that were each representing a really small percentage of the overall revenue for the company.
so we felt like it was a really [00:08:00] diversified business in that sense. I think the reason why a lot of other companies end up phasing out of that is that it is a fairly labor intensive, and resource intensive business because, you might have one owner that only owns a single property as opposed to consolidating units in a larger building.
there are definitely a lot of challenges with that. that's why we thought when we were starting this company that, we could bring in, a, fresh perspective and, utilize technology from the beginning in order for us to operate the business in a more efficient way.
So everything that we've done with the business has always been technology first and trying to create the systems and the processes to make, the business and the management run, a lot more efficiently. than a lot of other businesses. I think at that time, since then a lot of those businesses have tried to migrate, to some of the pre-packaged software that's out there.
there are definitely more, folks in the industry utilizing more technology. At the time that we started though, there just weren't very [00:09:00] many in the industry that, were using any sort of modern technology.
And so that kind of allowed us to differentiate ourselves initially. and it allowed us to grow the business really rapidly. I think we also started at a pretty good time too, at the point that, we started the single family property management business. The sales market was definitely not as strong as it is today.
there were a lot of, individual homeowners that were looking to rent their properties out. the market has obviously shifted a little bit with everything that's going on with. COVID in that, housing prices are obviously continuing to rise. the rents, at least on the single family, side have not really kept up with the increase, in the sales price.
So if someone's looking to buy a single family property to rent out, a lot of times the numbers, just don't make sense. it's obviously different for the larger development projects. but, anyway, that's what, sort of helped us to, get up and running really, really quickly.
when we first kind of, started to market [00:10:00] our offering, we saw that there was, a lot of interest in, utilizing a property management company that did utilize, technology. So something as simple as doing, walkthrough inspections of the property. being able to actually provide the owner with, pictures and a video of their property was something that a lot of other companies at that time.
those were kind of, things that allowed us to, differentiate ourselves, allowed us to be able to, gain a fairly large market share at that time. and then it was, through that process that we saw that there were other, ways of potentially expanding the business.
To Matt's point, initially, it being like the brokerage side of things and then also the association management side of things as well. Okay. And then just kind of the transition from, just 'cause we'll go in detail obviously later on, but, so you started 2014 with your friend Tom.
and then how it is evolved, it just went into more commercial real estate. do y'all do Just management. It sounded like you do some brokerage, but I didn't. What's the [00:11:00] percentage of breakdown of like how it's evolved or just give us a general timeline of now and then we'll rewind it to eventually how y'all got started?
Yeah, so like 95%, I would say would be management with 5% roughly, maybe closer to 10, being brokerage Okay. Yeah. So today that's how it's Based out. Yep. Gotcha. Alright, well is there anything else that you think we should know, about your company before we rewind it? Yeah, well, I mean, I think that be interesting sort of part of, of how we actually got involved with like, looking at sort of different businesses to get into like, it, it wasn't so much that we said that, hey, we're gonna go into brokerage or that we're gonna go into commercial management.
oftentimes it was more of an organic sort of, current client of ours who perhaps we manage their individual unit in a condo building here in dc. They would come to us and say, Hey guys, we're unhappy with our association management company. do you guys do this?
We love the [00:12:00] service that you provide on the individual management side. or on the other side of things with the brokerage, a client would come to us and say, Hey guys, been super happy with the way that you're managing my unit. It seems like there'd be, good synergy just passing off, potential listing to you guys if we decide to sell.
Do you guys do brokerage? And so initially we were just referring that business to other real estate professionals here in DC and then we sort of looked or took a step back and said, Hey, like, why don't we actually try this on our own? And that's how we got into these other businesses that we're currently in outside of just residential, management.
Okay. Seems like it makes sense. Yeah. I do have one question. I think before, We can figure out how you got started. So one twin is called Matthew. The other one's called Tom, right? You got it. Yep. So why the hell is it called Gordon James Realty Services? That's a good question. So that, that actually goes back to the original person who I started the business with, which was the roommate from college.
His middle name is Gordon. My middle name is James. [00:13:00] And so we just put the two together and we thought that Gordon James Realty kind of had a nice, you know, sort of a nice sound to it. I worked with that individual for about two years and then, you know, after the second year, we both, you know, sort of came together and there were things that, you know, I mean, it's always difficult to obviously go into business with anyone.
I think that, especially a friend. So he decided, right, let's get rid of the friend and bring family instead. So just make it even more difficult if you wanna get rid of him too. Yes, exactly. we have two older brothers too.
I can sort of speak to this, that like the relationship with a twin, at least, in our particular situation is, even like that much more different than like the relationship with the brother. the two of us sort of just kind of have this, common understanding.
we have a really, effective way of being able to communicate everything to each other. I think the friend that I went into business with, in terms of the communication, which is obviously essential with any sort of business partner, there were definitely difficulties with that, where I [00:14:00] kind of felt like I had to tiptoe around different issues.
I just didn't feel like that was really a sustainable way to grow. I sort of have the mindset of just being as, straightforward as possible when it comes to communication. And, not everyone really has that same style. So bringing my twin brother in kind of allowed us, to be able to communicate really clearly and effectively that way.
and, not really like worrying about, tiptoeing around each other. We definitely have moments, where we argue and, where we don't see eye to eye on things, but we're able to, sort of like hash it out. in the moment there just like aren't any hard feelings with it.
I mean the decision that, I made two years into this, I think was the best decision that I could have made for the business. Well, yeah, I look forward to kind of getting into details on that too, if you don't mind later on. Sure. Because I think that helps too, because if you have a friend and.
you're saying, tiptoeing around anything, even if it's non-business related, no one wants to do that forever. There'll be times when that happens, right? So it's just, yeah, look forward to diving into details, but why don't we go ahead and rewind it to, y'all growing [00:15:00] up. y'all decide where you wanna start in the story, and did, were you entrepreneurs kind of growing up?
let's go back. early on when we were growing up, we were born in dairy New Hampshire. We lived in Syracuse, New York until we were seven. And then from seven, up until we graduated college, we lived in New Jersey.
that's where our parents' house was. And so, yeah, we did have this entrepreneurial sort of interest, from an early age. And that actually started, with, my brother and I, you. Going sort of door to door, the neighborhood and asking if they needed landscaping services.
it was something that, we actually sort of enjoy doing for, my parents' house. And it ended up, growing into not a big business, but one that we took care of the neighbor's yards, took a lot of pride in that. And it also taught us a lot of really important life lessons.
So, for example, there was this one neighbor of ours, that, didn't want to increase year over year the fees that we were looking to charge. We understood and knew how much a professional landscaping [00:16:00] company would charge. We felt like our services were actually comparable. And so, it took a lot of courage I felt at that time to be able to knock on his door, and, let him know, Hey, we're looking to increase the fees, here's why.
he ended up agreeing to the increased fees. It was just a really good sort of life lesson for us. But you're not gonna get anything unless you actually ask for it. I a hundred percent agree. It's so funny 'cause I've been thinking about this lately too.
when I grew up too, I would cut some lawns for apartment buildings and stuff like that. I mean, just one or two just on the side of make side hustle money. But I still remember, I feel like the person was taking advantage of me. Because I was doing it for like 30 bucks maybe, or 35.
it was huge. I think I was maybe 13 or something like that. And I always thought, it's so funny that you said that. 'cause I literally was thinking about this yesterday. that's a good life lessons. No one's gonna tell you they're gonna keep taking advantage of you unless you kind of do the homework and figure it out.
And I remember eventually that I did ask for money, but it was still even like five or 10 bucks more. I mean, it probably should have been like double. You know, to be honest. And so I think that's a great point that you bring up. I would even [00:17:00] touch on that a little bit more if I were you.
Part of what I realized was that like we took a lot of pride in the work that we did, and I knew that, you know, just visually looking at the yards and the way that we, you know, manicured the yard or edging, you know, the leap blowing, et cetera, like we did everything that a professional company would do.
but you know, with the age differential, being a 14-year-old at the time, with our neighbor being a probably 65 plus year old, he was a developer, had a lot of experience, sort of, you know, dealing with contractors was sort of a hardnosed guy. it was really difficult to work up the courage to go over there.
And actually we asked for more money. We knew that we deserved it. We knew that we were being underpaid at the time. And it was one of those things that I think, you know, if I was in the business by myself at the time without having Tom with me, I think a much more challenging thing to sort of do that.
Him and I sort of talking with each other and saying, Hey, you know, let's go for it. Like, we know that we deserve those. I think was critical in that situation. It's important, you know, to have sort of a [00:18:00] partner to be able to rely on and to also give you sort of the encouragement to be able to have those conversations.
And I think that that has served us well throughout, you know, our career together, owning this business and, making sure that, yeah, I mean, those things just come up. It was a really important life lesson for us. Well, and I do think that it was also kind of interesting too. I mean, even at that early age, you know, we were probably only maybe 12 or 13 at a time.
even at that time were able to figure out what each of our strengths were. I had less of a fear of going to the neighbor to ask for us to be able to increase the fee.
Matt was probably a bit more hesitant, he was kind of more of the executor. the one who, knew how to do the striping and the perfect edging and all that. and, I was kind of more of, the business side of it.
I mean, obviously I would help him, but my strength, was definitely more so in being able to go up and, communicate, that fee increase to the neighbor. And I think that sort of carried through even to our business today.
And that, the two of us just, and with any business partner you kind of have to understand, [00:19:00] where the strengths and the weaknesses are for each one. Ideally, each business partner has, strengths in different areas, and, you're able to sort of like, stay in your lane so that way you don't have, both, business owners or partners, sort of like focused or being good at the same thing.
it was definitely, again, an early lesson that, I feel like just kind of transcended, to today. and then, the other piece of that too is that the only reason why we were going door to door, asking neighbors if we could mow their lawn was that, a lot of that had to do with our parents.
they definitely did not believe in, giving us, any sort of allowance. they were very big believers, sort of that old school mentality in, they gave us a ton of freedom, but they weren't gonna give us money, to do a lot of things that we wanted to do with our friends.
And we knew that the only way for us to be able to, go to the movies or, just like go out with friends and be able to pay for things was by making our own money. and I think that that was a, pretty amazing life lesson. I think one that the two of us, both hope to kind of pass down to our kids and [00:20:00] that, if you're giving someone something for free, then you know, they just sort of have that expectation, that everything is gonna be for free.
And that was definitely not the way that we were raised, but. I mean, I think that the two of us are incredibly thankful that, our parents kind of raised us in that way. to be able to just kind of show us that from an early age. I was wondering can y'all plan on telling your kids to like, go ask for more money?
'cause I was thinking, like, my parents, I don't think even they knew, like, I didn't really have to work. I didn't get allowance, but they provided for everything, so it didn't really matter. So it was more just fun money, right? Yeah. That I could go do other stuff with. But I'm like, I think I would tell my kids too, I'd make sure that, hey, go see how much it seems like they might be taking advantage of you.
it's not like, oh, I wish my parents would've told me, it's not like they would even know. But I'm like, maybe I'll probably tell them that early on if you don't ask for it, you're never gonna get anything. Yeah. 'cause I don't think that anyone is gonna practically just, 
no one is going to. Most people are not gonna practically just offer it to pay you more. And so being able to speak up for yourself and be able to, [00:21:00] ask for, what you think, you deserve, I definitely think is a really, really good lesson. I think it's definitely something, that I'll definitely teach my kids.
that goes with asking for more money or I member, you know, there were, you know, different situations in school where, I, maybe felt like I deserved a better grade. and I think a lot of parents, tend to make the mistake of, trying to speak up for their kids.
we even see it to this day, we actually own quite a bit of college student housing as well and, we'll still have, parents reaching out on behalf of their college student about a question that for whatever reason their son or daughter is not comfortable asking.
we were never in a position like that. our parents, were big believers and, you know, if you want something or if you feel like something is unfair, you know, like speak up for yourself. and that's definitely, something that we definitely did I think it's something that, we'll definitely pass down to our kids for sure.
Yeah, I mean, that makes a hundred percent. Yeah, I definitely agree with you. I would never make my kids into pussies where I'm gonna [00:22:00] call about apartments. Right. Like, I think the only thing that I would say is like, Hey, go make sure that, you know, see if they're, if you're, you know, only charging 30 bucks, you might, Hey son, you might want to go check out and see if, right.
You know, what other people are charging, right? So I think that's as important for anyone listening now, even now as kids. Like, you know, don't call the guy who's s mowing and say, Hey, I want 50 for my son instead of 30. Like, make the son ask for it, but just make him aware of it. 'cause especially at that age, I mean, I think even up until I got in my late twenties or thirties, I'm like, oh, you know, people aren't out to.
Take advantage of you, but they still will. Like, so it's always important that, you know, I think anyone listening kind of teaches them that lesson. Don't do it for them. Just make them aware of it. For sure. 
Starting first. First business at 12 or 13 or 14 or whatever up in that age range, cutting lawns and then take us from there. Yeah. And then, after that we actually, caddied, which was a eyeopening experience for us. We caddied at a local, private golf course, in our town, in New Jersey, in Sparta, Sparta, New Jersey.
And, and the reason I was an [00:23:00] eye-opening experience is we actually saw firsthand, how we, if we were older in that same position as being a member of this private country club, how we'd actually wanna treat someone that was in a position of a caddy, for example. What we didn't like and what we actually, I think were very, very aware of was that.
A lot of the older members of the club, they wanted to have this aura about them as they're wealthier, individuals and they get what they ask for. And so that translated to how they treated. the caddies there. and so part of what we realized was that number one, we don't ever wanna be like that no matter how successful we are as we get older.
And number two, it sort of taught us as well how to have a bit of a backbone even as, we were probably 15 at the time when we were cadding. And to know when to push back when it's appropriate and not in a rude way in any way, but just, you know, learn how to get some respect even as a young kid.
And that's hard to do, especially when you're looking at these older members and, they're [00:24:00] sort of cocky and, they're coming off as people that we don't necessarily respect, but we also grinded through it. And we did it for like two years. we had to wake up on the weekend, Saturday and Sunday when we caddied at like 5, 5 30 to get in the caddy line and then maybe didn't finish our day until, two, three o'clock.
We used to try to double bag, which means carrying two golf bags because instead of making 40 to $50 around, you could make, 90 to a hundred dollars round. And so, it sort of was important because we just continually to make money. We sort of did things that we didn't necessarily want to do, but that we knew that the end outcome would be what we wanted.
I'll tell you, it felt great, after the weekend counting on much money we made from Cadding and, it was a great job. it definitely taught us a lot. Well, do you have an example of, how they treated you and how you didn't want to treat other people that way?
Yeah, so for example, one of the other caddies that we golfed with, was sort of a nerdier looking type. and they used to call 'em Poindexter, So [00:25:00] it definitely is lame, but at the time it really hurt the kids' feelings.
I agree. it is mean, but it's just lame But it's definitely still mean, like, yeah, but I agree. It's these older guys, That are trying to impress their friends by, making, fun of a, poor 14-year-old kid who can't really defend himself and, he just, stood there with his head down.
I mean, that was a story that I feel like, definitely stuck with, both of us in, that, that sort of showed us at an early age that it is important to, have respect for everyone. whether it be, a service person or someone like that, doing kind of a shitty job.
it's definitely important. to answer your question, I'm not sure what we did to have that not happened to us. we were lucky enough that it did not, and I think just my brother Tom and I just not buying into that sort of like, we didn't laugh when they called that, person that caddy pointdexter, but we just didn't really buy into that BS.
I would say that we were probably actually a little bit on the quieter end and we didn't bring attention to ourselves to, have them focus their attention on us. And I would say that's sort of one of the reasons or one of the ways that we, I [00:26:00] think we're not on the receiving end of a lot of the things that happened during our time as caddies.
Yeah. I mean, I think that's a great point. And again, I'm not laughing at him, but what they said to the kid, like what shithead would you do that? Right. You know, to be honest, like, it's more like, yeah, like I said, you're such a loser for. That. Yeah. You think that's cool to even that that's, I don't know.
And the funny thing is, when we came home and, told our parents, we we're always, and we still are really close to our mom and dad. I mean, they, we tell 'em everything. And so, I mean, when we came home and told them that their reaction was not to tell us to never go back there again, they were proud of us.
That we actually recognized at that time that that was wrong and that we didn't wanna be like that. And so that to them was great. Like, I think they saw a lot of, maybe even subconsciously a lot of the lessons that we were learning in this, what would be considered a pretty crappy job or have a hard job.
and they sort of, my dad especially, I think, valued and liked the fact that we were just working hard. and we were able to, see, what we didn't like [00:27:00] about that, but still sort of continue forward in that. Right? Yeah. Maybe you didn't even, I guess maybe it made an impact at that point, but it's kind of crazy even thinking about today, but you're 36, is that Yeah, both y'all, that still made an impression even today that you even can remember that.
Those things that will make your impression, that's why it's important, even if we have bad bosses or whatever. But when you see people being shitty people, you're like, okay, I don't want to be like that. And that made enough an approaching 'cause I mean it, this is obviously y'all's story to tell, but I remember there was something like, I went to a soccer camp and I was about the same age.
I would say about 14, and I was wearing a backpack. I still remember this. I had a patch on it on the back of it. It was like a G sport, like regular backpack. And like two college kids were making fun of me. And I'm like, in my head I'm like, you fucking losers. Like you're, you're making fun of a 14-year-old.
And I'm like, obviously I'm not as big as them, but I'm like man. Like, I just can't believe people even act like that, that you think you're cool, that you're like 22, 23 making fun of like a 13 or 14-year-old, you know? Right, right. And it sounds even worse if it's like older guys [00:28:00] that y'all are coughing with.
Like it is just kind of sickening that it's embarrassing that the guys who do that, it's, it is usually just 'cause, I mean, they've got a worse life, you know, if they're the ones actually making fun of 13 or 14-year-old boys on golf tours, you know, for sure. Some unhappiness, you know, somewhere in there.
Right, right. Obviously like a lot, I mean, it is really, really sad. I mean, it's almost as bad as it gets when you're making fun of like, I don't know, pre-teen or teenage boys or anything younger, like, oh, that's terrible. But yeah, so you're so at that age, okay, it is good that you're getting these impressions and hopefully they're kind of values that you think of today, obviously, and bring to your business.
But where do you go from there? As far as after doing the golfing? Yeah. And so then we worked, after that Worked at a local driver range, which was a great gig for, Tom and I both, because we were able to run both the little pro shop, as well as, run the opening and the closing of the property.
And so essentially we had like full on management, like responsibility. The owner was more of a hands off owner, which we always found surprising because we were [00:29:00] 17 at the time, when we started that job. but it taught us sort of responsibility. It taught us how to, act in the right way and, have the right morals in place we could have easily have, stolen money from that, business.
I mean, it was, for the most part a lot of people paid cash. but Tom and I used both. And so I think, you know, that was part of the reason why the business owner trusted us. but it was also just great to be able to, you know, sort of, we felt run a business in that capacity. It was a very small one, a driver range, but still, you know, it felt good to be able to, you know, sell a.
clubs out of the, pro shop. We were actually commissioned on that, which was our first quote unquote, sort of sales commission that we received. and it was fun. we really enjoyed that job. well it sounds like y'all are busy all through, I guess, high school and going to college.
And if this is happening, I was curious, what did your parents do for work? I don't think we touched on that. Yeah, so our mother was a stay at home mom, which, we loved at the time. And, still loved the fact that she was, that was actually, you know, she was a really important part of our upbringing.
Our dad was, one of the C-level executives of an IT company. he started [00:30:00] his career in sales and then sort of worked his way up, traveled a lot, worked long, long hours. But he was, for the most part, the sole, sort of breadwinner for the family. And we relied on him to obviously live the life that we lived.
my mom and dad did a really good job of, instilling that in us. in terms of the work ethic, the reason why our father was working so hard growing up, and we were, always very understanding of that and the fact that perhaps he was not home as often as the other dads, but we also saw what we had perhaps that the other families did not.
And so that was sort of a good life lesson for us. And I mean, the other thing that they always strived to instill in us was, you know, there's a lot of, kids growing up that didn't really sort of understand what things cost. and kinda like how, in terms of paying for things how that actually worked.
I think that something that our parents really tried to, discuss with us is they were never afraid to discuss money with us. I mean, we didn't know, obviously how much my dad made, but anytime that we would go out to dinner as a family, there was always sort of the discussion around how much things cost on the menu.
maybe we wanted to [00:31:00] get something, that was fairly expensive. they would tell us to pick something cheaper. they would take us, to Disney World. We used to take a family vacation there every year. as kids, we always wanted to, buy, the different food at the concession stands.
we always used to pack our lunch and I think that, my parents obviously could have afforded it, but I think that it was, probably subconsciously or, maybe it was just the way that they were brought up. but it was always, kind of like, I see it now in that, I think it definitely taught us a lesson in just to always be aware of that kind of stuff.
I think that it's definitely helped us, with our business now in terms of always thinking, about money and, how much things cost and how to bring more money in. a lot of that, definitely comes from, Both of our parents.
it's funny I don't think my parents even. Taught me this, my mom's fucking tight as anything, she on a farm or whatever. when I look at a menu, I always basically look at the cheapest thing and start going up. I'm like, is it worth it? Is it worth it? Right. I don't even look at.
I pretend they're not on the menu. So, you know, is it maybe y'all kind have the same lifestyle [00:32:00] or I guess kind of growing up or even, you know, I, I don't know. And it is nothing that I'm ever gonna stop. 'cause I'm like, ah, to me it's, I don't want, like, if I go somewhere and just like a $40 dinner and I see something that's like 12 or 10 and I'm, I'm like, ah, I'll get the $10 one 'cause that looks good to me anyways, you know, 
It's not worth the value to me, you know? Yeah, no, I completely agree with you on that. Yeah. Okay. Alright. So maybe I'm not the only crazy, so at least three of us think the same. I don't know. But, alright, so from the golf store, then y'all go to college and are y'all working in college too? Yeah, so yeah, we did.
So we worked actually throughout college as well, I think different than a lot of, in terms of our direct friend group, most of 'em actually did not work in college. But again, it was one of those things where, our parents certainly could have afforded to give us some free spend money to go out on the weekends, to go out to dinners, whatever it may be.
we were lucky enough, that we didn't have to take out any loans for college, They were able to pay for the, entire four years. Part of the deal with that though, was that we would be, paying for everything that fell outside of [00:33:00] that, right? So that fell outside of the room and board cost.
both Tom and I at the time, we were into working out, and there was a great job on campus that was working at the school gym. It was an unpaid internship for the first semester, which was a great deal for them because they didn't have to pay us. but in return for that though, we got our, personal trainer's license.
And then also the following semester, we were able to actually continue working at the gym, but got paid. And I remember the pay, I can remember what it was per hour, but I remember being actually pretty good for back in, this was now probably 2009. and so we worked at the university gym.
It would've been 2006, I'm sorry, so we worked at the university gym, for like two and a half years, three years while we were in school. And it was great. I mean, it gave us the sort of income that we needed to be able to do what we wanted to do. And, you know, we used that money also to buy books.
That was part of the deal that my parents had with us. but yeah, we worked at that job throughout, throughout college. And so were y'all getting sw so you could go back in [00:34:00] these guys? Well, we're golfers. We're Jersey guys, so I think that's one of the reasons why we got into working out.
We unfortunately, as we've sort of, gone on in our careers and we're dads now, we do not currently work out like we used to. But yes, we were definitely concentrate on getting swollen, especially before going out at night. Oh yeah. Nice. You say you had the gel in your hair and everything?
I was making sure they, so were y'all, oh, y'all were on the Jersey Shore actually, no, no, we didn't. That's what I'm envisioning. I don't know if I should be, but it wasn't quite that idea people were envisioning, right. Like, like physically, like we maybe looked kind of like that.
But I mean, I think just the mantra that we subscribed to though was actually the complete opposite. we weren't actually big on going out to clubs. We, I don't think even knew what house music was. And so, no, I mean, that certainly was not our sort of, you know, it's not, what we looked to do was to go out late night to the bars.
We were actually more homebodies. we got sort of like to stay in with, a small group. Tom and I had, [00:35:00] girlfriends throughout college and I think it sort of allowed us to do what we wanted to do, which was like not go out super late at night and, be more, centered, which is what we, sort of liked more.
Okay. And then what year did y'all end up graduating? So we ended up graduating in 2008, Sort of an interesting year to graduate. that was sort of pre Leman collapse, I believe. and so foray into our first career, was actually seeing what they deemed as a great recession.
Okay. And a lot of our fellow, you know, people that we went to school with are friends. They weren't able to sort of keep solid unemployment or were doing jobs that were far below what a college grad might be doing. And so we started our careers at a company called the Corporate Executive Board. it's now called CEB, it was bought over by a company called Gartner.
But yeah, and we started our careers there, back in 2008. And so what was interesting is, one second real quick. Yeah. So did y'all, y'all worked for the same company coming out? We did, yeah. Okay, I gotcha. I didn't know if [00:36:00] that would be, was that easy to do too? Or y'all, like you were package deal or we're not doing it?
we sort of used the twin thing to our advantage. I remember, they had job fairs back on campus and, we strategized before about the best way to approach it. growing up Matt didn't really feel this way, but I kind of felt a bit more like this.
I didn't really love being a twin growing up because we used to get a lot of attention. we also used to dress alike till we were probably in fourth or fifth grade. I was never really a big fan of the attention, and so I didn't really love being a twin at that point.
But as we got older, I think into like our college years, we started to sort of see the benefits of, you know, how we could potentially use being a twin to our advantage. I mean, you know, one thing is that like, like do you switch girlfriends and they don't know, that only happened once. there was a girl in, in one of Matt's lectures that, you know, thought that like he was attractive or whatever, and Matt was dating his girlfriend at the time I was single.
I think that that was back in the day when Facebook had like the pokes. And so I think that, he got poked, [00:37:00] poked multiple times. And then I don't remember how we, I think it was like the first year that Facebook was Yeah, yeah, exactly.
No, you're definitely right. 'cause I mean, we're the exact same age, so I definitely do remember a Pope feature. I totally forgot about that. So you just said that. I forgot like how we kind of transitioned it to me, but, you know, I sort of like stepped in or I think, you know, maybe like Matt responded and then like, I met her out for a date.
she didn't actually realize that I wasn't Matt, for like a month. so that was definitely fun. that's one of the ways at one point, that we were able to kind of take advantage of it. the other thing was, just like the job fairs, we sort of had like this strategy where, he would go and speak to a recruiter first, and then, I'd follow up like three minutes later and speak to the same person.
And it was always the same reaction, like, didn't I just speak to you? And then, that sort of opened the conversation. We talked about being identical twins, and it was just amazing how effective it was in terms of differentiating ourselves. it's a really simple thing, you know?
I also like to believe that, we had some substance [00:38:00] behind, what we were actually speaking to them about. but it definitely just kind of made us, stand out, compared to, other people who maybe didn't have that same thing.
our intention though was always to work at the same job after college. I don't even think that it was something that we had discussed. It was just sort of unspoken that, we just wanted to live in the same place after college. and so we got the job at the corporate executive board.
We both started there together. we lived in the same apartment. and again, that was back in, 2008. and the corporate executive board was like a consulting company at the time. They, sold like best practice research. so we worked there. And then later 2008, maybe early 2009, they did some, fairly large mass layoffs.
they probably laid off, I think in the role that we were in, maybe 80 or 90% of the people. I was actually one of those people that was on the chopping block. I think relates back to some of what we had discussed initially about, some of the lessons that we had learned subconsciously in terms of speaking up for ourselves.[00:39:00] 
I remember when I knew that I was one of the people that was gonna be fired, I scheduled a meeting with the head of the department. And at that time, I didn't really know what I was gonna discuss with them. I just knew that I didn't wanna be fired. And so, prior to the meeting, I prepped for it.
I, pulled all my numbers. I came up, with the business case as to why they should keep me. I, went to that person, presented it to them, and then they ended up actually removing me from the list of people to be fired. and they sort of put me, in kind of like a transition role until they could figure out something permanent for me.
and the person that I spoke to, came up to me, after they decided that they didn't wanna let me go. And, he said that the only reason why they did that was, because I had the ball to go up to him, to actually, present or explain to him, why I should remain with the company.
and I think that goes back to, the earlier story that we're talking about, being proactive. When you asked for a raise, it's like no matter what, at the end of the day, you were proactive. And again, it's like you had the balls to go ahead and say something. You're like, I like a guy who's willing to do that.
'cause [00:40:00] then if there's a boss later on too, that maybe you're willing to say something if they're doing something wrong. Right. Right. So I think that's really important. For sure, for sure. Alright. and so, you know, we stayed there for a while. we started off as just like cold callers. And so, it was a pretty intense cold calling program.
I mean, you know, Matt would call into heads of finance. At that time I was calling into heads of HR and the goal was to just, set up meetings for the sales executive that like we were partnered with. So we did that for a while and then we transitioned into sales roles where I sold into heads of sales.
And then he sold into heads of finance. we did that for a couple of years. and then he ended up actually moving to New York to be with his girlfriend, and got a job at, was it Rson or No, My girlfriend at the time was living in New York, but I also, we were finance majors and I had this sort of, I wanted to pursue finance, and so I was able to, move to New York.
I got a job at a mutual fund company and, decided very quickly that that was [00:41:00] actually not the job for me, it actually sort of brought me back to the days of Cadding where it was one of those, you know, you had to really kiss ass to, the partners or to the higher ups to be able to have any upward mobility.
I found relatively quickly that, that was probably not sort of where I wanted to stay. then I moved, after that job in New York, to another job at a company called GLG very similar to CEB of the corporate executive board, and worked at that job for close to five years, where I was able to, travel about four days a week.
my job was to actually break into, the top 50 pharma and medical device companies that were not currently clients of ours. to find a way to be able to work with 'em. so a quote unquote sort of hunter job, that was sales related.
And I found that incredibly fulfilling. I found that job to be, you know, with the travel and with sort of the challenge of trying to understand and figure out the angle to, you know, how do we get into this massive company. and then to finally do it like that was, incredibly [00:42:00] rewarding. and it was a job that I, think I, a lot of the things that I learned, I still sort of take with me today.
And then after I did that, I decided to say, Hey, you know, I'm looking for a change in careers. my brother Tom, had started this company with that college roommate, he knew it was not working with a roommate and he was needing and looking for a partner. And so I was commuting back and forth from New York City to DC on a weekly basis for about a year, before moving to, DC full time, to commit to being a partner of this company.
Okay. And so what year did you do that? Did that in 2015. Okay, cool. So yeah, I think we got that part of the story of when Matthew joined. And thank you for kind of running down how you kind of came back into the company. But, can we kick it back over to Tom, I guess as far as after Matthew went to New York, Were you sad about that? Or did y'all have a discussion about that? I'm just curious on how that worked out. We didn't actually really have a discussion about it. I mean, I think he just maybe told me one day, Hey, I'm [00:43:00] gonna be moving to New York in the next two weeks. and I think that I said, you know, something like good luck.
we're not like super affectionate people towards each other, right? I mean, there's just kind of this common understanding that we care for each other. but I think that at that time when Matt left, back in maybe 2012, to go to New York, I think that we both kind of thought at that time that it was gonna be a really good experience for us.
It was the first time in our lives that we were gonna be apart. And I think that we both felt like it was maybe time sort of experience that spread our wings and, be on our own for a little bit. And I think that it was a really good experience in that way.
Like we always kind of had. Sort of the safety net of having each other around. And I think when he left, like we didn't have that and so we had to maybe learn to kind of, you know, fend for ourselves a bit more. I mean, like one of the things that was great at like, you know, working at the same company was that like we obviously had, other colleagues that like we were definitely friends with, but you know, we always both kind of like mutually felt like we looked out for each other more [00:44:00] than, you know, any friend like would ever look out for us.
We always 100% had each other's best interests in mind. when we were giving each other advice, it was always just like, coming from a really good place, we never had to question it.
when he left, the two of us didn't really have that anymore, but I think that was a good experience for us to, be able to kind of like see that, on our own. he moved to New York. I stayed with the corporate executive board for a few more years.
I continued in the sales role. and then I ended up moving to a different company a year before I started, Gordon James. and I was doing IT sales, for a large IT company. the reason why I actually moved is that it was a remote job and at that time, remote work was definitely not really a thing.
but I knew that I wanted to start the property management business. And so selfishly I sort of thought that, I could kind of do both at the same time. I could work for this company remotely and then it would also gimme some flexibility to be able to, start formulating what we wanted to do with the, property management [00:45:00] business.
I worked there for about a year, and then while I was doing that I was starting to kind of build up the property management clients. It was just me and my friend at that time that were kind of doing everything. So if we had to go show a property for rent, I was like running out to do that, or he was running out to do that.
We were figuring out, what we wanted the marketing to look like. we just had, a lot of work that, went into the upfront of what we wanted this business to actually be. so a year after I started that job at the IT company, I then decided, I was just getting too busy with the property management and so I quit that job, which, was a difficult decision and definitely a scary one.
I think most entrepreneurs would probably say the same thing, especially if they have a corporate job. that was definitely one of the most challenging decisions that I've had to make. in terms of being ready to actually pull that trigger and say, I'm ready to fully support myself.
really quick before jump into that. can we talk about, your transition first of like, even doing the, on the side it's, you know, did Gordon James being your kind of side hustle while you have the IT company, just tell [00:46:00] me how you're able even to get your first client, because I'm sure there's people thinking right now, maybe I wanna get into property management, maybe I wanna start my own company.
Yeah, I mean, maybe it might be one person listening where it doesn't, again, have to be property management, but I think that's almost the hardest hurdle is like, how do I get into an industry that you're not really in yet and get your first client and start doing that. So walk us through that, how you figured that out.
Yeah, so that was kind of at the time too, and I'm sure that it was probably even prior to this, but when, like, SEO really became a thing, you know, like trying to optimize the website, for like Google search results. So we, my partner and I both did a ton of research. you know, into like, and what, what is your partner's name?
Seth. I forgot Gordon. Yeah, so Seth was his name. Okay. Gotcha. Yeah, so we just, dedicated ourselves to trying to understand, SEO and, how to, do that in an, effective way to be able to, compete with the various competitors that were in the market at that time that we [00:47:00] started to do that.
SEO was a relatively new thing, and the majority of the competitors in the market were not focused on it. And you could tell that by, just looking at their website. so we put a lot of our own personal time into doing the research I used to participate in this. I had a membership to this site.
It was called Moz, MOZ. and at that time it was definitely, sort of like the leader, in SEO research. And so, we took a bunch of classes. I actually flew out to Seattle to, join a conference out there and just really wanted to learn everything that I possibly could.
So our strategy initially to get clients was to build a good looking website that we felt like looked better than our competitors, but also described our services better than our competitors. And then we started actually producing a lot of unique content. and so, a lot of it actually up to that point, because we had own college student housing, a lot of the articles that we wrote were kind of based on our personal experience with managing student [00:48:00] housing.
And so we started to just kind of, pump out these articles I think that we were maybe doing like, one or two a week. And, sure enough, we actually started with just that strategy. We weren't doing any sort of paid advertising at the time with just that strategy. We started to actually get organic inquiries through the website.
and then I started to actually go out, on the meetings to actually meet with prospective clients. one of the things that also really helped us too though, was that, Seth had worked for a different property management company prior to us getting this thing fully up and running.
That was definitely the other key. So we sort of figured out how to generate the traffic on our own. But the other part of it is like, well, how do we actually manage property? So there's a certification process in DC to become a licensed property manager. So we both did that. but then he worked for a company for a while.
and this was, I think prior to us actually deciding that we even wanted to start our own company. So, he worked for them for a while, was able to sort of, see some of the, inner workings, how they [00:49:00] operated things. There were a lot of things that he felt like they didn't really do that well, and he felt like we could potentially do better.
we took that experience. We took what we knew with SEO and were able to, revamp the website. And then we started to generate organic traffic. then I started to actually go out to these meetings. And I think the first 15 meetings that I had, I mean the first five meetings, I think I completely botched just because it was so brand new to me.
I really wasn't anticipating a lot of the questions that the prospective clients had. But part of my strategy was after every single meeting, any question that I didn't know I would write down immediately after I got out of the meeting. and then, I would go back to my office and I would write down what my.
after a certain number of meetings, I got to the point where I started to just kind of hear the same, common questions. it was at that point that I feel like I probably just got more comfortable. they probably saw me as just being a bit more confident.
it was at that time that, we then brought on our first client. and then, after that, again, we just continued to do, the [00:50:00] organic growth. we did some Yelp advertising once we started to get some reviews. and then, we eventually did some Google remarketing, some pay per click, and we started to get into some other marketing avenues.
But that was how we, we sort of came to, bring out our first client. And you are correct though, that was definitely one of the hardest parts of starting it. but part of what we thought with generating the content was we wanted to give, 'cause there was a lot of. uncertainty when it came to property management.
It's one of those industries that theoretically, and I guess it's similar to probably other, service industries. I mean, theoretically someone an individual homeowner could, definitely put their property up for rent on Zillow or whatever, and they could try to manage the property on their own.
but there are so many pitfalls and different things that you learn as you kind of go along, where if you only have a few properties and you're trying to do that or you just don't have the time, it's just one of those things that doesn't really make sense. So part of when we were [00:51:00] creating this organic content, part of what we were trying to do was to actually give owners, or, prospective clients all of the information that they would need to actually manage the property on their own.
we wrote articles about compliance. We wrote articles about the most effective ways to market the property. we gave them everything that they needed. With the hope that after they started to do some additional research on it and they, started to potentially go down that path, they might think like, do I want to actually make this another full-time job, or do I want to just hand it off to, these industry experts to be able to do it on my behalf?
So the articles were kind of meant to sort of do that, to show them that like we have, industry expertise, but then, you know, to also kind of give them what they needed if they wanted to do it on their own with the ultimate goal of, hoping that they would see the value in, hiring it out to someone else so that they don't have to deal with the headaches.
do you remember your first property that you got under contract? Yes. Yeah, it was a single family house. it was a pretty [00:52:00] good property. It was a single family house in Georgetown. And as with most. business owners that are just starting out, initially people would've questions for us, like, can you do this for us?
can you do a walkthrough of the property every week? and we said yes to that. So initially we said yes to almost everything that a client asked us. which was, part of the way that we were able to bring on some of our initial clients.
And like we were fully, I think aware of that going into it, that like we knew that we were gonna say yes to more upfront than we would in the future, but it was a way for us to just kind of get that base of clients and then to be able to kind of, use them as like, references or potentially, have them like refer us to one of their friends.
so we said yes to a lot. and that is not, a sustainable way to continue to grow a business. but I do feel like initially, that was something that we just did to kind of get the business off the ground. And what are you getting, like 10% of rent or something we were doing at the time.
So we did a lot more [00:53:00] research before we figured out the pricing. so we ended up actually just undercutting all the competition. So the competition, the average of that time was 8% for the rent. we were charging 6.5%. and then for the leasing fee, it was like a full month's rent and we were charging like 75% for that.
So we were saying yes to a lot more things and we were undercutting our competition on price to try to get some of the market share. Okay. And so you're doing this slowly again on the side for a full year. So what is the point when you actually, quit your full time?
Like how much money are you making the company, are you splitting 50 50? So just tell us about this. Yeah. decision, because this is the biggest decision other than starting the company. So we were splitting all of the profits, 50 50. We had really low overhead because it was just the two of us.
at that time, we ended up purchasing a subscription to, sort of like an outta the box software. So we were, with just the two of us, we were actually making pretty good money between like the [00:54:00] leasing fee and the property management fee. I wanna say that at the time that I made the decision to stop working, I think that we were at like 50, around 50 clients.
when I was taking a look at the numbers where I was trying to get to in terms of my mindset as to what I felt comfortable with to actually leave the current job, I just really wanted to be pulling in at least half of what I was making with my current job.
once I got to that point, I was pretty frugal. So what were you making in your current job at that time? I wanna say I was making, like 80,000 bucks a year. Okay. And I think that's a good rule of thumb too. I mean, it depends person to person, but I think you're getting a hundred percent is you're waiting too long because, you're only using half your time.
So even like you're thinking if you get half of that and you're spending half your time on it versus the IT job, then you theoretically that second year can make equal amount, but there's also so much more potential. 'cause then you're putting your full energy into it. Exactly. Well, and that was kind of the other point of consideration too, I think, is that like [00:55:00] when we got to 50 properties, and it was just the two of us, we sort of grew the business to a point where it was at a certain point where, I felt like I couldn't really, dedicate enough time to the property management business while I still had the ComCom business too.
I knew the goal of, wanting to get to at least half of my current salary as long as, it would not be to the detriment of the property management business. I definitely agree with you that if I was to have pulled that trigger earlier, we probably could have grown it, even faster.
from my standpoint in terms of being comfortable and my current expenses at the time and how much I had saved up, I felt like getting to half that point, was the right number. and so I got to that point, ended up making the decision to transition, full-time to be able to work for myself and, definitely nerve wracking, but also the best, decision that I could have made.
Okay. And so like tell us about like how, how much you were working before that. Were you working like 20 hours a week and. You're able to do more than that or I like, what's [00:56:00] your work week go like, from split two jobs to full time into your own thing with your partner Seth? Yeah, I mean, so I, I was working pretty long hours when I was trying to do both.
There was just so much to kind of figure out with the property management, but I think initially it didn't really even feel like work. I, I mean, it, it was honestly fun to, to try to grow something and, you know, sort of see that I was able to do it somewhat successfully. So it didn't feel like, it just didn't feel like a corporate job, right?
In terms of like, if I'm putting five hours into my IT job and I'm putting five hours into the property management job, the five hours for the property management, just flew by the five hours for the IT job just felt like it kind of crawled. so I was splitting it, you know, at least initially I was probably doing like 80% for the it, 20% for the property management.
in terms of time allocation towards the end of it. When I got to the point of making the decision to transition full-time to the property managing business, it was probably [00:57:00] more like 70 30, 70% property management and then 30% to the IT business. being remote, there just wasn't as much oversight as there would've been if I was in an office, and I might not have been able to do that had I been in a corporate office.
I think me being remote actually allowed me to be able to kind of transition to that 70 30 split. from afar you're in New York, right? Tom, where are you at this point? Like, I forget even location wise. I stayed in DC so I was in DC at the time and then moved to Arlington, Virginia, which is just like 10 minutes outside.
Okay. And then Matthew, I mean, do you know about your brother growing in the business at all, No. So I mean, I, I did know that he was growing the business and that was sort of, I mean, the biggest reason for me at least, to want to figure out a way to join him.
And so that's when I decided to, you know, off the side of my desk as well, commute back and forth from New York to DC while still working at my corporate job in New York. it was a, they allowed me to essentially work [00:58:00] remotely. So I had that flexibility and I was coming down to DC to really help Tom grow the business.
this was after he had bought out the partner Seth, and so he needed help. There was a lot of things that, he at the time was struggling with and I felt like, my presence at the company and I did this for a full year, we just made a lot of changes within that year that I was commuting back and forth from New York to dc and that also gave me the confidence that, this is something that I want to do full time.
I think when I was doing that, from what I can remember, I was just getting reimbursed my travel expenses back and forth from DC to New York. I wasn't actually getting a salary. so that was all discussed prior to me sort of doing this full time moving my when I first moved to New York, which became my wife, from, New York to dc after that year that I was, doing that sort of in between.
yeah, we talked about what our sort of take home might be for the two of us decided to split the business 50 50 and I decided to move to DC full time to, dedicate all my time to [00:59:00] do this, to work on this business. But even before that, like my brother has a business, 
But I never talked, like even when I see him, We don't talk really business 'cause I don't see him that often. But I mean, like before you joined the company, 'cause we're still only like, I guess about a year in right For Tom, going full-time into, the property management business.
Did you know anything about the business from afar or and were you thinking like, Hey, I'd like to get in that or talk to your brother? I did. so Tom and I, we actually did talk a lot about the business. I mean, I would say most of the calls that we had a couple times a week were actually about how the business was doing.
And so like I had a really good understanding of exactly how the business was progressing and it certainly sounded very exciting. and so yeah, so we, we caught up like on a weekly basis every other day. just talking about the business, some of the challenges, the struggles, how it was with the partner, I mean, all that stuff.
Yeah. And I think part of it too, from my perspective is that I was also wanting to kind of get his feedback on certain things with the business too. I mean, there was so much that was just brand [01:00:00] new. and I discussed some of it with my business partner at the time, but I felt like, having his perspective on some of the things that we were struggling with, with the business was definitely helpful.
part of the, discussions that we were having was, to also tell him and try, to convince him at some point, to be able to actually come to DC to do this full time. we knew that we didn't really wanna split the business three ways because it just wasn't big enough at the time.
we really knew that we just wanted it to be the two of us. Part of the reason why I came to that decision with my, current partners initially with the business, a lot of it is just new business development and that was definitely not a strength for him. I knew that Matt had, the experience that we shared at the corporate executive board, and then every job that he had thereafter was a sales job.
I knew that for us to kind of take this to the next level, we needed, two people that were able to generate new business to be able to go prospective meetings with clients. I mean, that's probably the biggest, aspect of starting a new business is just like being willing to sort [01:01:00] of go out and, try to like sell it.
during those conversations it was definitely me and the two of us kind of talking about how we would make this thing work, what the buyout would look like for the current partner, how we would actually fund that buyout and sort of the plans for the future growth of the company.
Well, yeah, that makes sense. 'cause you were saying, Tom, I guess your partner at the time, Seth, and we'll talk about the transition when Matthew came down and kind of not took the place, but at least, you know, it just became the two of y'all as, as is, you know, 50 50 partners. But can you talk about the transition before Matthew came down with your partner 
at the time, Seth, right? it seems like he could, it'd be hard, really, really hard for you even to start this business without him. You know, even that first year or two that, that's what I was wondering, like how the hell do you get into property management when you haven't even have any background?
Which is fine, everyone's gotta start somewhere, but it seemed like it made it much easier. But I definitely see where you were saying if you're doing the blog posts and everything, I could see how like, long term, you're the one driving the actual business, getting the clients. 'cause that's what matters at the end of the day, no matter what business, you've gotta be able to find clients and bring 'em in.
And that maybe after you kind of got [01:02:00] things set up with, said that he wasn't able to bring in new business or help you on that. And it's not gonna be as helpful it sounds like. So I guess you kind of came to that realization too. Yeah. Exactly. I mean, you know, I think that it was definitely, on the new business side of things.
And, you know, him, not really, I mean, 'cause he had not come from a sales job. he was, working for an engineering company, like right outta college. so, that was like his first job where the passion was initially for him. And so I feel like, he just didn't really have, he definitely didn't have the skill to do new business development.
And I don't really think that he had the desire or the drive to do it. Right. I mean, there's some people who just like hate sales. they just feel uncomfortable. Like they just don't want to do it. And then other people that, love it and then other people that like, just don't mind it.
And when we first started the business too, as we were kind of figuring everything out, we ran into a lot of obstacles and a lot of things that we had never seen before. Things that just sort of sprung up that like we, maybe didn't know we should have been doing initially and then found out, the hard way that [01:03:00] like, we should have been doing it.
I think even just figuring out something as simple as the maintenance for the properties. I mean, I had owned properties and so I sort of felt like I, had a handle on how to properly respond and address maintenance issues.
But there was definitely a big difference between college housing, upstate New York and the expectations of what a professional tenant wanted in DC. and so, where we were in Binghamton, the laws that were in place were not nearly as, cumbersome.
Yeah. We're not nearly as cumbersome as they were in dc. DC has a lot of compliance, like probably a lot of other big cities. And so, you know, there's certain things that like you have to do that you have to record. you know, one of the mistakes that like we made initially is that we were doing a lot of things over the phone.
And so, you know, we would be speaking to either an owner or the tenant over the phone. And then, you know, we thought that like, we were clear on everything. And I mean, we, we actually had this happen where, you know, so we, there was an issue that popped up. We had the [01:04:00] conversation with the tenant over the phone.
We thought that, you know, things were clear and that we were on the same page. And then I think it was like two weeks later we get a letter from DC that, there's some sort of fine imposed because of something that we didn't do correctly. And it was a learning lesson for us I think at the time, you know, that like we had to sort of think about things in a different way.
do you remember what that was? Because that's hard. I can't even imagine The city finding you for something between you and a private tenant. do you remember what that was? So it was something like, I wanna say that it had something to do with the air conditioning in the property and in these older homes in DC.
When they retrofit a house with air conditioning, they're trying to retrofit, you know, town home that was built back in like the 1890s or like the early 19 hundreds. it's not uncommon when they did the initial install that they're not doing the load calculations correctly. And so the airflow in all the rooms, it's just not adequate.
this wasn't air conditioning. This had been heat. it was in the winter and there was one room in the house [01:05:00] that was, they had the thermostat set to 75 and there was a room in the house that was down to like, 65. I don't remember the exact numbers. in DC tenants, they have something called the Tenant cus advocacy office where tenants can actually contact them and they can file a complaint.
And so the tenant filed a complaint, they came out to do the inspection and they said that the airflow was not adequate in that room. it just wasn't able to bring that, room up to the correct temperature they basically give you a timeframe. They say, if it's not resolved within, three days, then we're gonna find you.
they sent us a letter, we couldn't get it resolved in three days, and they find us. and so one example of, many hard lessons, that we kind of had to learn upfront. There were other things that popped up similar to that where, I was actually, able to get, on the phone or craft, an email to the owner or tenant.
A lot of times I, at that time, I was actually, trying to meet people in person. So if someone had an issue and I knew that it could have potentially created a fine for us, I would actually schedule time to go out to the [01:06:00] property, and, be able to kind of like talk 'em off the cliff in person.
and so, I was doing all of that, my business partner. along with the new business development, wasn't really able to handle those types of, combative situations. And that was a lot of what we had upfront because again, we just didn't know what we didn't know. there were definitely mistakes that, we made upfront that we had to correct.
and so that, you know, that that was definitely another big part is that like I knew that I needed someone who, again, for lack of, of a better term, you know, had the balls to be able to like, you know, do that so that I wasn't the only person, you know, at, at the business that like was able to do that.
This was prior to again, us having a full-time staff where at some point you, you know, you're able to like delegate some of those things. so that's, you know, that's what, you know, with all those things combined, I, I came to the realization that it's just not gonna work out with, with Seth and it was a really difficult decision for me because to your point.
I think without him, I [01:07:00] wouldn't have been able to start the company. the experience that he was able to share and gather from the prior company that he had worked for was invaluable for us. In, reducing, a lot of those, potential mistakes, that you just haven't operated in that industry before.
so that was really difficult and I think that was something that I kind of had to, reckon with internally. And, it definitely took me a few months to get to that decision where I said to myself like, if I don't do this, then the business won't succeed and I'm gonna have to give up everything and I'm gonna have to go back to working, for a corporate company, which was the last thing that I wanted to do at that time.
And leading up to that point communication, started to kind of die down a little bit, where we weren't really communicating as well together. I started to ask him to do some of the things that I was doing on the new business side and on, the issue resolution side to get him to try to come to that decision on his own where he maybe felt like, this wasn't really the right fit for him either.
a few months down the line, I ended up, having a [01:08:00] meeting with him where I, discussed my concerns. I told him, you know what? I kind of needed to see change with him if I felt like, we were gonna kind of continue this thing. and I also gave him the out at that point.
And I said that, you know, if it's not something that he feels like he can do, that I'm willing to buy him out completely. I was also candid with him at the time telling him that, you know, I had been speaking to Matt about, potentially joining us. and so he thought about it for about a week and he came back to me and he said, you know, he didn't want to continue.
he was okay with me buying 'em out. we signed all the paperwork. I bought him out. Matt ended up coming on with us full time and, unfortunately I did not maintain any kinda relationship with Seth. after we, completed the paperwork and, he got his final payout.
Alright, well yeah. Thank you for walking. You did a perfect job walking us through it. I think that was nice how you were able to do that too, where you start giving them that responsibility for them to come to the decision to themselves and that you [01:09:00] didn't force 'em out. 
How those partnerships dissolve or whatever. but it seems like you did it as well as you could. I mean it and given time to think about it, but maybe the first step is yeah, making, you can't force 'em to go do that stuff. But again, if you feel like you're the only guy who can go talk to these tenants who are not happy or whatever, give them that responsibility to see that they're probably not suited for that, and that's what you need to keep going forward.
maybe you need 'em for the first six months or a year, but you can't just have a partnership forever because they introduce you to a certain industry. they can't just ride those coattails forever Like you said, you're gonna have to close the business. You need someone who's gonna help going forward and what value they add, so, exactly.
it is good that he came to that realization that hopefully, said it seemed like it worked out pretty well. So then Matthew comes in and what ends up happening there? It kind of tells about the transition. Yeah, I mean, so after Seth left and after Matt came in, there was a lot of teaching that, had to be done.
Matt was new to the industry, and so our first step was [01:10:00] for me to teach him the ins and outs and all the, hard lessons that I learned to make sure that, when he, comes down that he's not making those same mistakes.
And so there was a lot of, us getting together, me teaching him the business. And then at the same time he was studying to complete his test to become a real estate agent. in DC it's a requirement where you're either a licensed property manager or a licensed real estate agent.
he did that. I was probably at the time, working 16 to 18 hours a day because we didn't really have a staff at that point. between trying to, train him up. And also, manage the existing portfolio. it was just a ton of time, that was being put into it.
and then, eventually Matt got up to speed. we were able to then kind of split the responsibilities, with the business where I focused more on the operations, the finance and the management side of things. And initially Matt was just kind of focused on like the leasing side of things.
they're part of the same contract, but they're two fairly distinct sides of the business. we ran like that for a few months. We realized, that we [01:11:00] needed to bring on some additional employees to assist with some of the more administrative tasks and allow us to be focused on more of the strategic direction of the company and not necessarily going out to, open up doors for prospective tenant.
we wanted to both have that experience because in my opinion, as an owner, if you haven't done it from the ground up, I just feel like it's a really, really difficult thing to understand fully you could still delegate it to other people, but I feel like the two of us having actually done every single aspect of the business, anything that we asked one of our employees to do is gonna be something that we've done, in the past and that we have a full understanding on.
I agree with you a hundred percent. it's not like you're trying to become an accountant and learn all that, but within your own business, you should know everything, right? You are a property management company, so if you haven't done any of that, like it's kind of hard to be the head of it.
So as you came on, Matthew, tell us about. the difference between having a job, and then coming into this, did you take a pay [01:12:00] cut as well? And just tell us about, that transition for you?
when I came into the business, full-time, I did take a pay cut and that was sort of a important discussion that I had my wife at the time to help her understand that I saw future growth and potential earnings of being a part of this business, far exceed, what I was currently doing for a full-time, more corporate job.
And so once I got her buy-in, then it was all in. I mean, like Tom alluded to, when I first started with him full time, a lot of the days that we had together were from really 7:00 AM until 10 or 11:00 PM And I think, you know, part of that was because we were really excited about the business.
The other part of it was because we didn't have enough staff at the time. And then the most important part was that I was. learning the business. from the ground up. And so it was everything from, conducting and doing the showings of my own to being a quote unquote showing agent, to figuring out and understanding how to actually execute the leases, to bring in new clients.
And so us being able [01:13:00] to have a very solid understanding of, each individual facet of the business, I think allowed us to, train the employees and train them well, and also have the employees look at us as saying, wow, these guys actually did it on their own. What they're asking me to do, they've already done themselves.
I think there's a lot of value in that. And then the second part of that is it really helped me understand how to bring on new clients. And it was because I was able to talk specifically about a lot of the activities that we do on a routine basis. And without having. That on the ground, understanding and not delegating it upfront.
That's how I learned this business, was to do it, myself. every part of the business, every job, I think was critical in, our growth as a business. the growth of our company I think was really a part of Tom and I both understanding every facet of the business and being able to talk about it.
And so over the last six, seven years, what's been the hardest obstacles that you've had to go through? in building the business, I mean, the hardest obstacles that have really [01:14:00] been getting the right staff in place, and I think that's a challenge that a lot of businesses struggle with, but it's understanding and figuring out how to get the right staff in place.
Then the second part of that for, as a business owner, is understanding how to delegate appropriately. and then I think once you understand and figure out how to do that, it allows the business owner yourself to be able to focus more on the strategic direction of the company. You know, look at the p and l balance sheet on a monthly basis, like do structured activities like that, which is super important for the growth and for the planning of the company, and without appropriately delegating.
I think it's so hard to actually do that. and I think that some companies, and we definitely saw this with ourselves too, is that, initially it's just all about growth. I mean, we were dead set on, trying to grow this thing as fast as we possibly can, because, from a personal standpoint, we wanted to, obviously make sure that like we were having more success and we were in our, in our prior jobs.
But, you know, I mean that was the mindset it was on, you know, how do we grow as fast as possible? [01:15:00] We reached a point, relatively quickly actually after Matt came on where we got up to about 350 properties. And it was at that point that like we, we put some work obviously into the, sort of process initially and like how we were gonna have the team structured.
But it's really different going from 50 properties to going to 350. It's like with any other small business, you know, when you first started, you're able to kind of do it with a small staff. It's like super manageable. the owner kind of has their hand in like, every single aspect and then you end up growing and you get to the point where like, things aren't operating as smooth as they should be because we haven't really taken time to kind of sit down together and, refocus and, kind of like re-strategize about like, how do we go now from, three 50 to 600 properties 
It was a bigger challenge, I think, going from three 50 to 600, because the businesses got more complex as we had more employees. We had to make sure that we had systems and processes in place to make sure that, they were, in compliance with all of the different, [01:16:00] regulations that we were faced with.
how do we further delegate tasks? you reach a certain point when, like as an owner you can't have your hand in everything. And even though you can't, you still need to have visibility into everything that's happening. And so we sort of, hit the brakes.
When we got to that three 50 mark, we restrategized, we restructured the team to a certain extent. We identified some key hires that, we wanted to make and we put a lot of time and energy and money at that point into. developing a custom software, which we built on, salesforce.com, to help us to be able to, facilitate, the future growth.
we definitely wanted. it was a hard decision to make to say, okay, we're gonna pull back on, trying to grow the business because we know that we're at that critical mass where if we don't figure this out, we're just going to continue to grow, but we might not even be making more money because we just can't operate it in a way that is efficient, that gives us the profit margin that [01:17:00] we need to have.
It was like, how do we take the existing clients that we have and, make them more profitable? And then also think about, future growth in, a, more kind of like streamlined way. and in a way we're not gonna be waking up in the middle of the night, freaking out about, thinking about something that like someone should have done, but they didn't do.
and that just involved, again, kind of taking a step back on the growth and focusing more on training our people, hiring additional people and then, focusing more on the, process and the software did that for about a year and a half.
moving over to salesforce.com was a huge, huge undertaking for us. One that we didn't really, I don't think fully understood the full scope of it when we first did it. we're really happy that we did that. like looking back on it now. and then, once we got to that point, that's when we were able to actually, start capturing some of the brokerage business.
'cause we ended up starting a brokerage. And then, also kind of transitioning into some [01:18:00] of the more, homeowner association and commercial real estate side of things. And we both feel pretty confident that if we hadn't taken a pause at that point that we would not have been able go into these other businesses and we would've just been operating potentially with more single family residential units, but we would've been, running around like chickens with our heads cut off because we hadn't taken the time to actually figure out what the process should be so that we can take the growth even further.
Matthew, what year was that, that y'all made that transition? That was, 2017. 18? Yeah, 2017, 18. Okay. So was this more like Tom Steel that he was dealing with it because you had, you've been in the business a couple years. I know y'all both said you're, obviously involved in it, 50 50 partners, but were one of y'all more involved in it than the other when you switched over to Salesforce?
Yeah, I mean, I took on the bulk of that transition. Okay. and then Matt, what were you doing Matthew, at the time, like had y'all split and delegated roles? 'cause that's kind of [01:19:00] important too. We did. We, definitely split. There was a clearer separation in our responsibilities.
So yeah, Tom was more on the backend systems, processes, part of it. And then I was more on the front end client facing, dealing with the staffing, you know, the training, et cetera. That's what I was focusing on. But even though when y'all were younger, you said it was kind of the opposite though, right?
Yeah, it was. Right. Okay. But, as we evolved in our careers, I mean, I, I, you know, realized that I was more suited for sort of the direct client interface or interfacing. Tom was sort of more focused too mean to him.
Yeah. On the back end. I get it. I mean, it makes sense. Well then that's the reason I was asking and I guess Tom had been a little bit longer. But then I'll ask you, Tom, as far as the transition to salesforce.com, 
when you're doing that transition, how long did it take? was it like a year and you thought it would be like a month? Oh, I mean, it was like a year and a half. I mean, at least it is crazy how long I that because that is a huge struggle.
[01:20:00] I a hundred percent agree with everything that you're saying. you probably would eventually fail if you don't make that transition. But then you don't wanna make that transition 'cause you know how long it's gonna take. But anyone who's made transitions, like the 50 to three 50, but then the three 50 to 650 properties just walk us through that struggle 
And then halfway through, if you're like, shit, is this worth it? Should I keep going back? Yeah. If you don't mind elaborating a little bit more on that. Yeah, I mean, I think like, you know, the saying like, ignorance is bliss. I mean, and to a certain extent it sort of applied to this that, like, when I met with the Salesforce rep and we were kind of going through like what the system looks like and like what the platform can do, which, you know, you could probably launch a spaceship using Salesforce of like, you knew how to code it correctly.
I mean, it's an incredibly, incredibly powerful dynamic tool. it's amazing and it's why they're like a, $15 billion company. when I had the first call, I thought it was gonna be significantly easier than what it ended up being. They made it sound like it was kind of this no coding kind of platform and we could get everything set up super easy and we get into it.
it was within that first week and we had to sign a tier contract with [01:21:00] Salesforce. And as a small company, signing a tier, contract is a huge deal. how much did that cost? I think that initially when we had first signed up, it was like 15 grand a year, You know, it's still 15 grand a year, right?
It's not like we're talking a hundred bucks a month. like if you're, a small property management company getting started or something like that. I mean, these other software, the sort of pre-packaged outta the box software, you know, you pay like a monthly fee, but you're not locked into a long term contract.
because we were locked into it, I mean, I was, you can't get out, you're like, shit. I'm like, I'm stuck with this. and I knew what it could do because I had done a lot of research on it. So I knew that there was so much customization that could be done where I felt like a lot of the other management software fell short.
And, our idea of success at that point was growing in terms of, gross revenue and net profit. We never really associated success with how many employees we have. I've spoken to other small business owners that are like, you know, yeah, we're doing great.
We have 50 employees. We never felt that way, right? I mean, for us it was about how do we keep our team as lean as possible while still continuing to grow? And we knew [01:22:00] that utilizing something like Salesforce would allow us to be able to do that. so it was at least a year and a half until we got to the point of being able to actually bring, the properties over into the system and manage the leases and do a lot of the workflows that we had set up.
it has evolved over time since then. it's still something that, continues to evolve. I'm not dedicating the time that I was initially, but to your question though, about, if I ever kind of got to the point of thinking like, I just like want to give up and like, go back to the old software.
Yeah. I mean that happened, probably on a weekly basis throughout that entire, year and a half, at least, maybe a month or two prior to that, that continued to happen. We got it to the point though, where I was starting to kind of see the light at the end of the tunnel and I was starting to really see the power of using a system like that.
And I was seeing it get to the point of coming really close and being able to transition the properties. And it was at that point that I was confident that we were making the right decision even [01:23:00] prior to us, like fully utilizing that system. but yes, that happened all the time, but you sort of reach a point where, you know, if, I mean, when I was nine or 10 months into it and I was still questioning whether or not it was the right decision.
There are so many things that go through your mind where, you know, one, you have the cost aspect, but I think that the other more important thing is just like the amount of time that I personally dedicated into trying to, develop it in a way that like would work for the business. I look back on those nine months and I was like, I can't give up at this point.
I'm not gonna kiss the nine months goodbye. But then the other thing in my brain was saying, maybe it is time to just cut the cord on this, the loss is a loss and just go back to using the other software, Something I think inside of me our future growth, you know, priorities for the company was like, we need to be able to grow this thing in a more sustainable way.
Property management companies, you know, it's a pretty well known thing in the industry. They have really, really small profit margin. we're [01:24:00] operating from, based on other folks we've spoken within the industry. we're operating at almost double the profit margin of other property management companies.
And I am confident that one of the ways that we were able to do that. was by being able to roll out this software to allow us to create more efficiency and reduce the employee count, or at least keep it as lean as we possibly can.
Yeah, I mean, it makes sense and hopefully it just, anyone who's listening now, we think it's gonna be an easy transition with anything with this, what you're doing on Salesforce, right? it is not. The good thing is, is that it sounds so great because it's so powerful, but then you don't get, once you get in there, you don't realize like, oh my gosh, like maybe I need to, I have to hire developer more than likely to customize it, to have it do what I needed to do and everything.
So, luckily you were at that point where it made sense. It's not like you were two years in and went with Salesforce 'cause that probably wouldn't have been the right time to Make that transition. I agree. Well, and I think that one of the things, looking back, one of the things that I would probably change is because I'm not a software [01:25:00] developer and I didn't really know like.
the right way to go about doing this. definitely kind of whiteboarding or drawing out the various flows and the diagram of what you want, the overall structure of the software to look like, and then what you want. All of the workflows related to that. to also look like and be able to just do it in a single document.
I would say if I knew that when I first started, I would've saved myself a lot of time. And to your point too, we ended up hiring a developer, probably about 10 or 11 months into it. it wasn't like a full-time developer, it was someone that, did freelance work with stuff that I couldn't figure out.
there's a certain, aspect having a keen understanding of the way that the software works. I think that something that I, would've done differently is not have gone quite so deep into it. And I sort of wish that I had hired that developer early on once I knew what I wanted, the overall structure and the workflows [01:26:00] to look like, to be able to, at that point, hand it off to a developer.
I learned too much about the inner workings and the coding of Salesforce. I got too caught up in that. now it's kind of nice because if we have to make a small tweak, I can do that. But like, is that really the best use of my time? Probably not. so that's something that retrospect, I probably would've done differently.
But it's one of those things that you don't realize and you think you're so close every time. I only know, 'cause I've been in that seat too, where I have my own database. I made my own Microsoft Access database. And then I'm like, well let me. Go ahead and put on Salesforce. And that was me with just virtual assistants.
And I'm like, dude, I am too early for this. But I had signed a one year contract and I'm like, what the fuck? I'm like, I wish I would've known. Like, I'm like, it probably I had to wait until I maybe had like five people on staff or something like that to make that transition. But I thought exactly what you thought that it was just gonna be like, okay, it should not be that hard.
And then I start getting in there and I already had a developer help me I figured out Microsoft Access database really, really well, where I'm doing all the coding and stuff. And yeah, same with [01:27:00] you. It's like, I probably should not have done that myself, but it did, help. I figured out how things flowed and whatnot, but I eventually got to a point I'm like, I've gotta hire someone to help you finish this thing out.
But again, when I try to make transition to Salesforce, I'm like, yeah, I'm definitely too early to make it this. 'cause I can't redo this all with a certain amount of budget to try to make this successful. So. Right. And that's the other side of it too is that, you know, we were at the point where like, I mean, if you hire.
a developer like full-time. I mean, you're talking about a ton of budget, being allocated to that. And I think that the other side of it too, I mean, there's something to be said about if you really believe in a software and it really is gonna change the business in the way that you think it is, my advice would be to probably spend a good amount of time in that software understanding it, because if I didn't do that initially, then I wouldn't have been able to even direct a developer in terms of like what they needed to do.
Because I didn't really understand everything that Salesforce could do. It was at that point, or I think the point that you understand the capabilities of it, that then [01:28:00] handing it off to a developer, is probably, the right time to do something like that. 
Well, I guess, Matthew, what's been the most rewarding part of joining her brother in business and I guess doing this over the last, you know, six, seven years or whatnot? Yeah, I mean, the most rewarding part has been. At least for me, I mean, it's seeing the growth of our staff, right? So it's seeing employees start at a junior level position, working their way up, making more money and achieving the things they want to achieve.
ultimately, when I sort of go to bed at night, I think about the number of people that rely on Tom and I to make sure that we're running a good business, right? and one that's a profitable business. And that's a huge responsibility and one that we take really seriously.
And so I get a tremendous amount of satisfaction, seeing people, that we've had for the past six or seven years that have been with us through the thick and thin, sort of achieving what they want in their careers. it feels amazing to me. Thank you both for coming on and doing a joint [01:29:00] interview.
It's been fun. I think it's only my second one doing it like this, and I think y'all did a great job. but before we get off, is there anything else you want to leave our listeners with as far as any type of entrepreneurs? 'cause I'd say most of our guys listening actually aren't even in the real estate industry.
But again, anything you can learn in one industry can apply to another. So is there any words of advice you have for the entrepreneurs listening? I mean, probably the biggest piece of advice that I would have, and, something that I'm grateful that we did initially is, and this was actually advice that I had gotten from my older brother who also has his own real estate business.
the advice that he gave us was, to not go too deep and not spend too much money or too much time on strategizing and thinking about what or how you're gonna go about doing things. if you don't know that what you're trying to offer or what you're trying to sell to the market is gonna be something that you are able to actually sell, a lot of people get caught up in if they're starting a company with a [01:30:00] partner and they want to have all of the legal documentation in place and, do all this initial work before they actually go out to the market and test the thing out.
Because that's the toughest and most challenging thing I think about being an entrepreneur is like, you're afraid that the idea that you have is not gonna be well received in the market. And that hinders a lot of people from going out and just seeing if it's an idea that actually works. Like I have met, different people that have created apps and they've spent five years actually working on it before ever, testing it to see if it's something that the market actually, cares about.
my advice would be. figure out a way to be able to actually test the concept in the market, see if there is a need or a desire or space, for prospective clients to be able to actually purchase it. And then once you've identified that that is the case, then at that point spend the money on, hiring an attorney to, draft the agreement between partners and, all the other stuff that, sort of like goes into the [01:31:00] business.
try not to get too caught up on that upfront, before actually, understanding whether or not it's something that can be sold. And Matthew, how about you? Yeah, I mean, it is similar to that. it's focused on execution, right? And don't be afraid to take that plunge into whatever it is that you're looking to do.
I mean, there's a tendency, to over strategize overcomplicate things, which is just not needed. And as, part of that, I think it's critical. to make sure that you focus on execution and don't be afraid to just put it out there and see how it's received by the market.
like Tom said, on the back end of things, if you do find that it's successful or it's well received by the market, then put money into, the legal paperwork aspect of things or the system or whatever the case is. But just don't be afraid to put yourself out there or whatever idea you have and test it out and, see how it's received.
Yeah. I guess even going back, Tom, what you were saying about your friend doing that app and just going out there and doing, instead of spending so much time figuring out is even not [01:32:00] the money, but the energy, the physical energy each person has and excitement you have in your business.
You want to keep going while you can early on. Maybe even when you started this management business, it seemed like you were ready to go right away versus. You could have spent a year trying to pick the right software and everything before you get started.
But everyone only has so much energy. not even money, but the energy of excitement. So do it while you still have the excitement, I think absolutely important. So, again, appreciate y'all both. Come on. If there, it's a way to reach out to y'all for saying thank you for doing the interview. What's the best way to reach out to both of you?
Yeah, so I mean, e email is is great. I think you have my email as well as Tom's Yeah, I mean, or yeah, you just like, you know, wanna reach out to the company. I mean contact@gordonjamesrealty.com, you know, or you can just go to our website, gordon james realty.com.
We have, you know, contact forms, so, you know, feel free to, to connect with us that way. And then we're on a bunch of the, you know, social media platforms, you know, Twitter, Instagram, Facebook. So yeah, definitely feel free to, to reach out to us any questions that you have. Okay, well, thank you both for doing [01:33:00] the interview here today.
